District of Columbia statutes.
44-1003.13

Judicial review.

Any person who is aggrieved by the results of a hearing held by the Mayor pursuant to this subchapter shall have a right to judicial review in accordance with § 2-510.

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 313, 33 DCR 1510
1981 Ed., § 32-1443.